Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Accidents; Liability in Tort

§ 77-9-431.
Notice of accidents.

Each railroad shall report accidents to the Mississippi Department of Transportation in the same manner, and utilizing forms which provide the same information, as required for accident reports by the Federal Railroad Act. The same damage thresholds prerequisite to reports under the Federal Railroad Act shall apply with respect to the making of reports to the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4307; 1906, § 4861; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7646; 1930, § 7089; 1942, § 7865; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 68, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-433.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Codes, 1892, § 4308; 1906, § 4862; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7647; 1930, § 7090; 1942, § 7866]

§ 77-9-435.
Railroads liable for negligence and mismanagement of employees, and mismanagement of engines.

Every railroad company shall be liable for all damages which may be sustained by any person in consequence of the neglect or mismanagement of any of its agents, engineers or clerks, or in consequence of the mismanagement of its engines.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 43; 1871, § 2429; 1880, § 1054; 1892, § 3557; 1906, § 4054; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6678; 1930, § 6152; 1942, § 7804; Laws, 1912, ch. 240.

§§ 77-9-437 and 77-9-439.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§77-9-437. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6679; 1930, § 6153; 1942, § 7805; Laws, 1912, ch. 151]

§77-9-439. [Codes, 1892, § 3559; 1906, § 4056; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6684; 1930, § 6154; 1942, § 7806; Laws, 1908, ch. 194]